Washington statutes.
RCW 5.70.030

Unreported sexual assault kits—Transportation to local law enforcement agency—Storage and preservation.

(1)(a) Any unreported sexual assault kit collected on or after June 30, 2020, must be transported from the collecting entity to the applicable local law enforcement agency.

(b) By January 1, 2021, unreported sexual assault kits collected prior to June 30, 2020, and stored according to the requirements of RCW 70.125.101 must be transported to the applicable local law enforcement agency.

(2)(a) The applicable local law enforcement agency is responsible for conducting the transport of the unreported sexual assault kit from the collecting entity to the agency as required under subsection (1) of this section.

(b) The applicable law enforcement agency shall store and preserve the unreported sexual assault kit for twenty years from the date of collection.

(3) The term "applicable local law enforcement agency" refers to the local law enforcement agency that would have jurisdiction to investigate any related criminal allegations if they were to be reported to law enforcement. The applicable local law enforcement agency is determined through consultation between the collecting entity or, in the case of unreported sexual assault kits stored according to the requirements of RCW 70.125.101, the Washington state patrol, and local law enforcement agencies.

[ 2020 c 26 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 26 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect June 30, 2020." [ 2020 c 26 s 19.]

Intent—2020 c 26: See note following RCW 63.21.090.